New Jersey, session 221, A2363.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1977, c.237 (C.26:2H-33) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Every nursing home operating in the State shall, within 90 days after the end of its fiscal year, file an annual report with the State Commissioner of Health.  Such annual report shall be in such form and shall contain such information as shall be prescribed by the commissioner, including the following: a.  A balance sheet of the nursing home as of the end of such fiscal year, setting forth assets and liabilities at such date including all capital, surplus, reserve, depreciation, and similar accounts; b.  A statement of operations of the nursing home for such fiscal year, setting forth all revenues, expenses, taxes, extraordinary items, and other credits or charges; c.  The name and address of each of the following persons: (1) The operator of the nursing home; (2) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns any interest in the land on which the nursing home is located; (3) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns any interest in the building in which the nursing home is located; (4) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns [a 10% or greater] any amount of interest in any mortgage, note, deed of trust or other obligation secured in whole or in part by the land on which or building in which the nursing home is located; (5) Any person who directly or indirectly, has any interest as lessor or lessee in any lease or sublease of the land on which or the building in which the nursing home is located; (6) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns [a 10% or greater] any amount of interest in any mortgage, note, deed of trust or other obligation which, although not secured by the land on which or building in which the nursing home is located, is considered an outstanding liability on the books of the nursing home and was executed to finance directly or indirectly the purchase of the nursing home, land, building, lease, or sublease pertaining thereto; d. If the nursing home or any person named in response to subsection c. is a partnership, then the name and address of each partner; e. If the nursing home or any person named in response to subsection c. is  a corporation, other than a corporation whose shares are traded on a national  securities exchange or a commercial bank, savings bank or savings and loan  association, then the name and address of each officer, director, principal shareholder, and controlling person of such corporation; f.  If any corporation named in response to subsection c. is a corporation whose shares are traded on a national securities exchange or which is a commercial bank, savings bank or savings and loan association, then the name and address of the principal executive officers and each director, principal stockholder, and controlling person of said corporation; g.    If the nursing home paid or received an aggregate of $2,500.00 or more during the fiscal year in connection with transactions with any person named in response to subsections c., d., e., or f., or any affiliate of said person, a description of the transactions, naming the parties thereto and describing the relationships which require the transactions to be described and the goods, services, payment, or other consideration received by each party to the transactions; h.    (1) The nursing homes most recent cost report submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  A nursing home shall file separate cost reports for each central or home office if the costs of the central or home office are reported on the nursing homes cost report. (2) On an annual basis, the Commissioner of Health shall prepare and submit a report containing the information received pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Governor, the Legislature in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-34 19.1), and the State Comptroller, which report shall be published on the Internet website of the State Comptroller.  The report shall:  contain aggregate regional and county data, not name or identify any nursing home; and list amounts for each category of expenditure made by nursing homes. (cf: P.L.1977, c.237, s.2) 2. The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.